Massachusetts, session 194th, H2474.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a special
commission established to study the growing youth sports industry in the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts.
(b) The commission shall consist of 9 members, as follows: one person appointed by the
president of the senate; one person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; one
person appointed by the governor; one representative from the Massachusetts Interscholastic
Athletic Association; one representative from the National Collegiate Athletic Association; one
representative from the National Council of Youth Sports; and three industry representatives who
operate youth sports organizations or venues in the commonwealth and who shall be selected by
of 2

the other 6 members of the commission. The appointees of the president of the senate and
speaker of the house of representatives shall serve as co-chairs of the commission.
(c) The commission shall investigate and make recommendations about: (i) best practices
of youth sports organizations; (ii) the potential need for stronger oversight and accountability in
the youth sports industry; (iii) the financial strains that youth sports organizations have faced
because of the COVID-19 pandemic; (iv) ways to ensure that children and families actually
benefit from private youth sports programs; and (v) the financial cost of participating in private
youth sports programs.
(d) Not later than 1 year after the effective date of this act, the commission shall file a
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Clerks of the House of
Representatives and Senate.
of 2